Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-818
Personal loans; rate of interest allowed.

Except as provided in section 8-820, no bank shall contract for or receive on or in connection with any personal loan a higher rate of interest than would otherwise be permitted by law, whether such rate is obtained by making charges on discounts without due allowance for partial repayments of principal, by taking deposits in lieu of repayments or by imposing fees or charges pretended to be for investigation, brokerage, service, other subterfuge or by any other device or means.

Laws 1965, c. 31, § 4, p. 214.